Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2957
Term of director.

(1) A director's term expires at the annual members' meeting following the director's election unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws. The term of a director shall not exceed three years.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, a director may be reelected for subsequent terms.

(3) A director continues to serve as director until a successor director is elected and qualified or until the director is removed, resigns, or dies.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 57.